Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-417
Lifetime permits;
fees; disposition.

Fees received for lifetime permits under the Game Law shall be
credited to the State Game Fund.
Twenty-five percent of the fees for lifetime permits shall not be expended
but may be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Income
from such investments may be expended by the commission.

Laws 1983, LB 173, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 32;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-202.03;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 127;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 9.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.